Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3491.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [135A.082] DEVELOPMENTAL COURSES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Developmental course requirements. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given: new text end new text begin (1) "adult basic education programs" means state-funded educational programs designed to provide foundational skills in reading, writing, and other academic areas necessary for workforce readiness and postsecondary education; new text end new text begin (2) "corequisite model" means a course model in which students enroll directly in college-level English courses that provide credits toward graduation while receiving concurrent academic support; and new text end new text begin (3) "developmental course" means a postsecondary course taken to prepare a student for college-level work and that the postsecondary institution does not grant credit for and that cannot be used to meet degree, diploma, or certificate requirements. new text end new text begin (b) Public postsecondary institutions that receive financial aid on behalf of students under section 136A.121 must: new text end new text begin (1) provide clear, written explanations to students regarding the difference between uncredited remedial or developmental courses and courses that provide credits that count toward graduation and require students to sign a written acknowledgment that the student understands the difference; new text end new text begin (2) implement a one-semester corequisite model for English courses in place of traditional stand-alone developmental education courses; and new text end new text begin (3) refer any student who does not meet the minimum placement criteria for enrollment in the corequisite course described in clause (2) to an adult basic education program for foundational skill development prior to reenrollment in credit-bearing courses. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner must: new text end new text begin (1) establish guidelines for the effective integration of one-semester corequisite support with credit-bearing courses; and new text end new text begin (2) provide technical assistance to institutions transitioning from traditional developmental education models to a corequisite model. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Reporting. new text end new text begin The commissioner must annually report on the department's website the following summary data: new text end new text begin (1) the number of students placed in noncredit remedial or developmental courses, credit-bearing corequisite courses, or who are referred to an adult basic education program; new text end new text begin (2) the number of students who complete uncredited remedial or developmental education within one academic year; and new text end new text begin (3) the number of students who enroll in credit-bearing courses after completing remedial or developmental courses. new text end